Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Interest on Deposits with Public Utilities

278.460.
Utilities to pay interest on deposits required of patrons — Commission to calculate interest rate annually — Interest rates for water districts and water associations — Administrative regulations.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a utility, including an electric cooperative organized under KRS Chapter 279, shall pay interest on amounts required to be deposited by patrons to secure utility service. The commission shall calculate the interest rate on an annual basis by averaging the one (1) year constant maturity treasury rate from September, October, and November, and shall notify utilities in December of each year of the interest rate to be paid by utilities for the following calendar year.

No water district organized under KRS Chapter 74 nor water association organized under KRS Chapter 273 shall pay interest that exceeds the rate it receives in interest, nor shall the interest payable to the customer at any time exceed six percent (6%) annually on amounts required to be deposited by patrons to secure water accounts.

The commission may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.

History.

2223-1: amend. 1994, ch. 221, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2012, ch. 22, § 1, effective July 12, 2012.